California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 in consultation with the CWDA, shall update the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature as information becomes available regarding the effects upon the program efficiency of implementation of semiannual reporting requirements set forth in Section 11004.1. The update shall be based on data collected by CWDA and select counties. The department, in consultation with CWDA, shall determine the data collection needs required to assess the effects of the semiannual reporting.

(f) Counties may establish staggered semiannual reporting cycles for individual recipients, based on factors established or approved by the department, provided the semiannual reporting cycle is aligned with the annual redetermination of eligibility; however, all recipients within a county must be transitioned to a semiannual reporting system simultaneously. Up to and until the establishment of a countywide semiannual system, counties shall operate a quarterly
 system, as established by law and regulation applicable immediately prior to the establishment of the semiannual reporting system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 37.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

11265.15.

(a) The department shall work with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, representatives of county eligibility workers, the Statewide Automated Welfare System, and client advocates to develop and implement the necessary system changes to prepopulate the semiannual report form described in Section 11265.1.

(b) Upon certification that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, and to the extent permitted by federal law, counties shall provide recipients with a prepopulated semiannual report, either via mail or electronically, at the election of the recipient, instead of a blank form to comply with the requirement described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 11265.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 107, Sec. 2.   (SB 146)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

11265.2.

(a) The grant amount a recipient shall be entitled to receive for each month of the semiannual reporting period shall be prospectively determined as provided by this section. If a recipient reports that they do not anticipate any changes in income during the upcoming semiannual period, compared to the income the recipient reported actually receiving on the semiannual report form or the annual certificate of eligibility required pursuant to Section 11265, the grant shall be calculated using the actual income received. If a recipient reports that the recipient anticipates a change in income in one or more months of the upcoming semiannual period, the county shall determine whether the recipient’s income is reasonably anticipated. The grant shall be calculated using the income that the county determines is reasonably anticipated for the upcoming semiannual period.

(b) For the purposes of the semiannual reporting, prospective budgeting system, income shall be considered to be “reasonably anticipated” if the county is reasonably certain of the amount of income and that the income will be received during the semiannual reporting period. The county shall determine what income is “reasonably anticipated” based on information provided by the recipient and any other available information.

(c) If a recipient reports that their income in the upcoming semiannual period will be different each month and the county needs additional information to determine a recipient’s reasonably anticipated income for the following semiannual period, the county may require the recipient to provide information about income for each month of the prior semiannual period.

(d) Grant calculations pursuant to subdivision (a) may not be revised to adjust the grant amount during the semiannual reporting period, except as provided in Section 11265.3 and subdivisions (e), (f), (g), and (h), and as otherwise established by the department.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), statutes and regulations relating to (1) the 48-month time limit, (2) age
 limitations for children under Section 11253, and (3) sanctions and financial penalties affecting eligibility or grant amount shall be applicable as provided in those statutes and regulations. Eligibility and grant amount shall be adjusted during the semiannual reporting period pursuant to those statutes and regulations effective with the first monthly grant after timely and adequate notice is provided.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 11056, if an applicant applies for assistance for a child who is currently aided in another assistance unit, and the county determines that the applicant has care and control of the child, as specified by the department, and is otherwise eligible, the county shall discontinue aid to the child in the existing assistance unit and shall aid the child in the applicant’s assistance unit effective as of the first of the month following the discontinuance of the child from the existing assistance unit.

(g) If the county is notified that a child for whom CalWORKs assistance is currently being paid has been placed in a foster care home, the county shall discontinue aid to the child at the end of the month of placement. The county shall discontinue the case if the remaining assistance unit members are not otherwise eligible.

(h) If the county determines that a recipient is no longer a California resident, pursuant to Section 11100, the recipient shall be discontinued with timely and adequate notice. The county shall discontinue the case if the remaining assistance unit members are not otherwise eligible.

(i) This section
 shall become inoperative on May 1, 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 11265.2, as added by the act that added this subdivision, whichever date is later, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 39.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Inoperative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

11265.2.

(a) The grant amount a recipient shall be entitled to receive for each month of the semiannual reporting period shall be prospectively determined as provided by this section. If a recipient reports that they do not anticipate any changes in income during the upcoming semiannual period, compared to the income the recipient reported actually receiving on the semiannual report form or the annual certificate of eligibility required pursuant to Section 11265, the grant shall be calculated using the actual income received. If a recipient reports that the recipient anticipates a change in income in one or more months of the upcoming semiannual period, the county shall determine whether the recipient’s income is reasonably anticipated. The grant shall be calculated using the income that the county determines is
 reasonably anticipated for the upcoming semiannual period.

(b) For the purposes of the semiannual reporting, prospective budgeting system, income shall be considered to be “reasonably anticipated” if the county is reasonably certain of the amount of income and that the income will be received during the semiannual reporting period. The county shall determine what income is “reasonably anticipated” based on information provided by the recipient and any other available information.

(c) If a recipient reports that their income in the upcoming semiannual period will be different each month and the county needs additional information to determine a recipient’s reasonably anticipated income for the following semiannual period, the county may require the recipient to provide information about income for each month of the prior semiannual period.

(d) Grant calculations pursuant to subdivision (a) may not be revised to adjust the grant amount during the semiannual reporting period, except as provided in Section 11265.3 and subdivisions (e), (f), (g), and (h), and as otherwise established by the department.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), statutes and regulations relating to (1) the 60-month time limit, (2) age limitations for children under Section 11253, and (3) sanctions and financial penalties affecting eligibility or grant amount shall be applicable as provided in those statutes and regulations. Eligibility and grant amount shall be adjusted during the semiannual reporting period pursuant to those statutes and regulations effective with the first monthly grant after timely and adequate notice is provided.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 11056, if an applicant
 applies for assistance for a child who is currently aided in another assistance unit, and the county determines that the applicant has care and control of the child, as specified by the department, and is otherwise eligible, the county shall discontinue aid to the child in the existing assistance unit and shall aid the child in the applicant’s assistance unit effective as of the first of the month following the discontinuance of the child from the existing assistance unit.

(g) If the county is notified that a child for whom CalWORKs assistance is currently being paid has been placed in a foster care home, the county shall discontinue aid to the child at the end of the month of placement. The county shall discontinue the case if the remaining assistance unit members are not otherwise eligible.

(h) If the county determines that a recipient is no longer a California resident,
 pursuant to Section 11100, the recipient shall be discontinued with timely and adequate notice. The county shall discontinue the case if the remaining assistance unit members are not otherwise eligible.

(i) This section shall become operative on May 1, 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever date is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 40.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Operative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11265.3.

(a) In addition to submitting the semiannual report form as required in Section 11265.1, the department shall establish an income reporting threshold for recipients of CalWORKs.

(b) The CalWORKs income reporting threshold shall be the lesser of the following:

(1) Fifty-five percent of the monthly income for a family of three at the federal poverty level, plus the amount of income last used to calculate the recipient’s monthly benefits.

(2) The amount likely to render the recipient ineligible for CalWORKs benefits.

(3) The amount likely to render the recipient ineligible
 for federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits.

(c) A recipient shall report to the county, orally or in writing, within 10 days, when any of the following occurs:

(1) The monthly household income exceeds the threshold established pursuant to this section.

(2) The household address has changed. The act of failing to report an address change shall not, in and of itself, result in a reduction in aid or termination of benefits.

(3) An incidence of an individual fleeing prosecution or custody or confinement, or violating a condition of probation or parole, as specified in Section 11486.5.

(d) At least once per semiannual reporting period, counties shall inform each recipient of
 all of the following:

(1) The amount of the recipient’s income reporting threshold.

(2) The duty to report under this section.

(3) The consequences of failing to report.

(e) When a recipient reports income exceeding the reporting threshold, the county shall redetermine eligibility and the grant amount as follows:

(1) If the recipient reports the increase in income for the first through fifth months of a current semiannual reporting period, the county shall verify the report and determine the recipient’s financial eligibility and grant amount.

(A) If the recipient is determined to be financially ineligible based on the
 increase in income, the county shall discontinue the recipient with timely and adequate notice, effective at the end of the month in which the income was received.

(B) If it is determined that the recipient’s grant amount should decrease based on the increase in income, the county shall reduce the recipient’s grant amount for the remainder of the semiannual reporting period with timely and adequate notice, effective the first of the month following the month in which the income was received.

(C) If a recipient has reported a change in income in accordance with subdivision (c), an overpayment shall not be assessed for the following month if the county was unable to provide 10 days’ notice of the termination or reduction in benefits before the first of the month following the month in which the change occurred.

(2) If
 the recipient reports an increase in income for the sixth month of a current semiannual reporting period, the county shall not redetermine eligibility for the current semiannual reporting period, but shall consider this income in redetermining eligibility and the grant amount for the following semiannual reporting period, as provided in Sections 11265.1 and 11265.2.

(f) Counties shall act upon changes in income voluntarily reported during the semiannual reporting period that result in an increase in benefits, only after verification specified by the department is received. Reported changes in income that increase the grants shall be effective for the entire month in which the change is reported. If the reported change in income results in an increase in benefits, the county shall issue the increased benefit amount within 10 days of receiving required verification.

(g) (1) When a decrease in gross monthly income is voluntarily reported and verified, the county shall recalculate the grant for the current month and any remaining months in the semiannual reporting period pursuant to Sections 11265.1 and 11265.2 based on the actual gross monthly income reported and verified from the voluntary report for the current month and the gross monthly income that is reasonably anticipated for any future months remaining in the semiannual reporting period.

(2) When the anticipated income is determined pursuant to paragraph (1), and a grant amount is calculated based upon the new income, if the grant amount is higher than the grant currently in effect, the county shall revise the grant for the current month and any remaining months in the semiannual reporting period to the higher amount and shall issue any increased benefit amount as provided in subdivision (f).

(h) During the semiannual reporting period, a recipient may report to the county, orally or in writing, any changes in income and household circumstances that may increase the recipient’s grant. Except as provided in subdivision (i), counties shall act only upon changes in household composition voluntarily reported by the recipients during the semiannual reporting period that result in an increase in benefits, after verification specified by the department is received. If the reported change in household composition is for the first through fifth month of the semiannual reporting period and results in an increase in benefits, the county shall recalculate the grant effective for the month following the month in which the change was reported. If the reported change in household composition is for the sixth month of a semiannual reporting period, the county shall not redetermine the grant for the current semiannual reporting period, but shall
 redetermine the grant for the following reporting period as provided in Sections 11265.1 and 11265.2.

(i) During the semiannual reporting period, a recipient may request that the county discontinue the recipient’s entire assistance unit or any individual member of the assistance unit who is no longer in the home or is an optional member of the assistance unit. If the recipient’s request is verbal, the county shall provide a 10-day notice before discontinuing benefits. If the recipient’s request is in writing, the county shall discontinue benefits effective the end of the month in which the request is made, and simultaneously issue a notice informing the recipient of the discontinuance.

(j) (1) This section shall become operative on April 1, 2013. A county shall implement the semiannual reporting requirements in accordance with the act that added this section
 no later than October 1, 2013.

(2) Upon implementation described in paragraph (1), each county shall provide a certificate to the director certifying that semiannual reporting has been implemented in the county.

(3) Upon filing the certificate described in paragraph (2), a county shall comply with the semiannual reporting provisions of this section.

(k) This section shall become inoperative on June 1, 2020, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 11265.3, as added by Section 42 of the act that added this subdivision, whichever date is later, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 41.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.   Repealed on or after June 1, 2020, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11265.3.

(a) In addition to submitting the semiannual report form as required in Section 11265.1, the department shall establish an income reporting threshold for recipients of CalWORKs.

(b) The CalWORKs income reporting threshold shall be the lesser of the following:

(1) Fifty-five percent of the monthly income for a family of three at the federal poverty level, plus the amount of income last used to calculate the recipient’s monthly benefits.

(2) The amount likely to render the recipient ineligible for federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits.

(c) A recipient shall report to the county, orally or in writing, within 10 days, when any of the following occurs:

(1) The monthly household income exceeds the threshold established pursuant to this section.

(2) The household address has changed. The act of failing to report an address change shall not, in and of itself, result in a reduction in aid or termination of benefits.

(3) An incidence of an individual fleeing prosecution or custody or confinement, or violating a condition of probation or parole, as specified in Section 11486.5.

(d) At least once per semiannual reporting period, counties shall inform each recipient of all of the following:

(1) The amount of the
 recipient’s income reporting threshold.

(2) The duty to report under this section.

(3) The consequences of failing to report.

(e) When a recipient reports income exceeding the reporting threshold, the county shall redetermine eligibility and the grant amount as follows:

(1) If the recipient reports the increase in income for the first through fifth months of a current semiannual reporting period, the county shall verify the report and determine the recipient’s financial eligibility and grant amount.

(A) If the recipient is determined to be financially ineligible based on the increase in income, the county shall discontinue the recipient with timely and adequate notice, effective at the end
 of the month in which the income was received.

(B) If it is determined that the recipient’s grant amount should decrease based on the increase in income, the county shall reduce the recipient’s grant amount for the remainder of the semiannual reporting period with timely and adequate notice, effective the first of the month following the month in which the income was received.

(C) If a recipient has reported a change in income in accordance with subdivision (c), an overpayment shall not be assessed for the following month if the county was unable to provide 10 days’ notice of the termination or reduction in benefits before the first of the month following the month in which the change occurred.

(2) If the recipient reports an increase in income for the sixth month of a current semiannual reporting period, the county
 shall not redetermine eligibility for the current semiannual reporting period, but shall consider this income in redetermining eligibility and the grant amount for the following semiannual reporting period, as provided in Sections 11265.1 and 11265.2.

(f) Counties shall act upon changes in income voluntarily reported during the semiannual reporting period that result in an increase in benefits, only after verification specified by the department is received. Reported changes in income that increase the grants shall be effective for the entire month in which the change is reported. If the reported change in income results in an increase in benefits, the county shall issue the increased benefit amount within 10 days of receiving required verification.

(g) (1) When a decrease in gross monthly income is voluntarily reported and verified, the county shall
 recalculate the grant for the current month and any remaining months in the semiannual reporting period pursuant to Sections 11265.1 and 11265.2 based on the actual gross monthly income reported and verified from the voluntary report for the current month and the gross monthly income that is reasonably anticipated for any future months remaining in the semiannual reporting period.

(2) When the anticipated income is determined pursuant to paragraph (1), and a grant amount is calculated based upon the new income, if the grant amount is higher than the grant currently in effect, the county shall revise the grant for the current month and any remaining months in the semiannual reporting period to the higher amount and shall issue any increased benefit amount as provided in subdivision (f).

(h) During the semiannual reporting period, a recipient may report to the county, orally or in
 writing, any changes in income and household circumstances that may increase the recipient’s grant. Except as provided in subdivision (i), counties shall act only upon changes in household composition voluntarily reported by the recipients during the semiannual reporting period that result in an increase in benefits, after verification specified by the department is received. If the reported change in household composition is for the first through fifth month of the semiannual reporting period and results in an increase in benefits, the county shall recalculate the grant effective for the month following the month in which the change was reported. If the reported change in household composition is for the sixth month of a semiannual reporting period, the county shall not redetermine the grant for the current semiannual reporting period, but shall redetermine the grant for the following reporting period as provided in Sections 11265.1 and 11265.2.

(i) During the semiannual reporting period, a recipient may request that the county discontinue the recipient’s entire assistance unit or any individual member of the assistance unit who is no longer in the home or is an optional member of the assistance unit. If the recipient’s request is verbal, the county shall provide a 10-day notice before discontinuing benefits. If the recipient’s request is in writing, the county shall discontinue benefits effective the end of the month in which the request is made, and simultaneously issue a notice informing the recipient of the discontinuance.

(j) This section shall become operative on June 1, 2020, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever date is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 42.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.   Section operative on or after June 1, 2020, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11265.4.

(a) If a recipient submits a complete report form within the month following the discontinuance for nonsubmission of a semiannual report form required pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11265.1, the county shall restore benefits to the household, without requiring a new application or interview, and shall prorate benefits from the date that the household provides the completed report form. These households shall be considered recipient cases and shall not be subject to applicant eligibility criteria. A recipient of transitional CalFresh benefits shall not receive prorated CalFresh benefits during the same month. This section shall not apply to the annual certificate of eligibility required to be completed pursuant to Section 11265.

(b) This section shall not be implemented until the department has obtained all necessary federal approvals under the federal Food and Nutrition Act of 2008 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 2011 et seq.).

(c) (1) This section shall become operative on April 1, 2013. A county shall implement the requirements of this section no later than October 1, 2013.

(2) Upon implementation described in paragraph (1), each county shall provide a certificate to the director certifying that semiannual reporting has been implemented in the county.

(3) Upon filing the certificate described in paragraph (2), a county shall comply with this section.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 19) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 21, Sec. 20.   (AB 74)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Section operative as of April 1, 2013, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11265.45.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 11265.1, 11265.2, and 11265.3, a CalWORKs assistance unit that does not include an eligible adult shall not be subject to periodic reporting requirements other than the annual redetermination required in Section 11265. This subdivision shall not apply to a CalWORKs assistance unit in which the only eligible adult is under sanction in accordance with Section 11327.5.

(b) For an assistance unit described in subdivision (a), grant calculations may not be revised to adjust the grant amount during the year, except as provided in subdivisions (c), (d), (e), and (f), Section 11265.47, and as otherwise established by the department by regulation.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), statutes and regulations relating to the 48-month time limit, age limitations for children under Section 11253, and sanctions and financial penalties affecting eligibility or grant amount shall be applicable as provided in those statutes and regulations.

(d) If the county is notified that a child for whom assistance is currently being paid has been placed in a foster care home, the county shall discontinue aid to the child at the end of the month of placement. The county shall discontinue the case if the remaining assistance unit members are not otherwise eligible.

(e) If the county determines that a recipient is no longer a California resident, pursuant to Section 11100, the recipient shall be discontinued with timely and adequate notice. The county shall discontinue the case if the remaining assistance unit members are not otherwise eligible.

(f) If an overpayment has occurred, the county shall commence any applicable grant adjustment in accordance with Section 11004 as of the first monthly grant after timely and adequate notice is provided.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on May 1, 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 11265.45, as added by the act that added this subdivision, whichever date is later, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 41.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Inoperative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

11265.45.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 11265.1, 11265.2, and 11265.3, a CalWORKs assistance unit that does not include an eligible adult shall not be subject to periodic reporting requirements other than the annual redetermination required in Section 11265. This subdivision shall not apply to a CalWORKs assistance unit in which the only eligible adult is under sanction in accordance with Section 11327.5.

(b) For an assistance unit described in subdivision (a), grant calculations may not be revised to adjust the grant amount during the year, except as provided in subdivisions (c), (d), (e), and (f), Section 11265.47, and as otherwise established by the department by regulation.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), statutes and regulations relating to the 60-month time limit, age limitations for children under Section 11253, and sanctions and financial penalties affecting eligibility or grant amount shall be applicable as provided in those statutes and regulations.

(d) If the county is notified that a child for whom assistance is currently being paid has been placed in a foster care home, the county shall discontinue aid to the child at the end of the month of placement. The county shall discontinue the case if the remaining assistance unit members are not otherwise eligible.

(e) If the county determines that a recipient is no longer a California resident, pursuant to Section 11100, the recipient shall be discontinued with timely and adequate notice. The county shall discontinue the case if the remaining assistance unit members are not
 otherwise eligible.

(f) If an overpayment has occurred, the county shall commence any applicable grant adjustment in accordance with Section 11004 as of the first monthly grant after timely and adequate notice is provided.

(g) This section shall become operative on May 1, 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever date is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 42.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Operative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11265.46.

(a) For an assistance unit described in subdivision (a) of Section 11265.45, the grant amount a recipient shall be entitled to receive for each month of the year shall be prospectively determined as provided by this section. If a recipient reports that he or she does not anticipate any changes in income during the upcoming year, compared to the income the recipient reported actually receiving on the annual redetermination form, the grant shall be calculated using the actual income received. If a recipient reports that he or she anticipates a change in income in one or more months of the upcoming year, the county shall determine whether the recipient’s income is reasonably anticipated. The grant shall be calculated
 using the income that the county determines is reasonably anticipated for the upcoming year.

(b) For purposes of this section, income shall be considered to be reasonably anticipated if the county is reasonably certain of the amount of income and that the income will be received during the year. The county shall determine what income is reasonably anticipated based on information provided by the recipient and any other available information.

(c) This section shall become operative on the first day of the first month following 90 days after the effective date of the act that added this section, or October 1, 2012, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 47, Sec. 8.   (SB 1041)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Section operative October 1, 2012, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11265.47.

(a) The department shall establish an income reporting threshold for CalWORKs assistance units described in subdivision (a) of Section 11265.45.

(b) The income reporting threshold described in subdivision (a) shall be the lesser of the following:

(1) Fifty-five percent of the monthly income for a family of three at the federal poverty level, plus the amount of income last used to calculate the recipient’s monthly benefits.

(2) The amount likely to render the recipient ineligible for federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits.

(3) The amount likely to
 render the recipient ineligible for CalWORKs benefits.

(c) A recipient described in subdivision (a) of Section 11265.45 shall report to the county, orally or in writing, within 10 days, when any of the following occurs:

(1) The monthly household income exceeds the threshold established pursuant to this section.

(2) Any change in household composition.

(3) The household address has changed.

(4) An incidence of an individual fleeing prosecution or custody or confinement, or violating a condition or probation or parole, as specified in Section 11486.5.

(d) When a recipient described in subdivision (a) of Section 11265.45 reports
 income or a household composition change pursuant to subdivision (c), the county shall redetermine eligibility and grant amounts as follows:

(1) If the recipient reports an increase in income or household composition change for the first through 11th months of a year, the county shall verify the report and determine the recipient’s financial eligibility and grant amount.

(A) If the recipient is determined to be financially ineligible based on the increase in income or household composition change, the county shall discontinue the recipient with timely and adequate notice, effective at the end of the month in which the change occurred.

(B) If it is determined that the recipient’s grant amount should decrease based on the increase in income, or increase or decrease based on a change in household composition, the county
 shall increase or reduce the recipient’s grant amount for the remainder of the year with timely and adequate notice, effective the first of the month following the month in which the change occurred.

(C) If a recipient has reported a change in income or household composition in accordance with subdivision (c), an overpayment shall not be assessed for the following month if the county was unable to provide 10 days’ notice of the termination or reduction in benefits before the first of the month following the month in which the change occurred.

(2) If the recipient reports an increase in income for the 12th month of a grant year, the county shall verify this report and consider this income in redetermining eligibility and the grant amount for the following year.

(e) During the year, a recipient described in subdivision
 (a) of Section 11265.45 may report to the county, orally or in writing, any changes in income that may increase the recipient’s grant. Increases in the grant that result from reported changes in income shall be effective for the entire month in which the change is reported and any remaining months in the year. If the reported change in income results in an increase in benefits, the county shall issue the increased benefit amount within 10 days of receiving required verification.

(f) During the year, a recipient described in subdivision (a) of Section 11265.45 may request that the county discontinue the recipient’s entire assistance unit or any individual member of the assistance unit who is no longer in the home or is an optional member of the assistance unit. If the recipient’s request is verbal, the county shall provide a 10-day notice before discontinuing benefits. If the recipient’s request is in writing, the county shall discontinue
 benefits effective the end of the month in which the request is made, and simultaneously shall issue a notice informing the recipient of the discontinuance.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on June 1, 2020, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement section 11265.47, as added by Section 44 of the act that added this subdivision, whichever date is later, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 43.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.   Repealed on or after June 1, 2020, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11265.47.

(a) The department shall establish an income reporting threshold for CalWORKs assistance units described in subdivision (a) of Section 11265.45.

(b) The income reporting threshold described in subdivision (a) shall be the lesser of the following:

(1) Fifty-five percent of the monthly income for a family of three at the federal poverty level, plus the amount of income last used to calculate the recipient’s monthly benefits.

(2) The amount likely to render the recipient ineligible for federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits.

(c) A
 recipient described in subdivision (a) of Section 11265.45 shall report to the county, orally or in writing, within 10 days, when any of the following occurs:

(1) The monthly household income exceeds the threshold established pursuant to this section.

(2) Any change in household composition.

(3) The household address has changed.

(4) An incidence of an individual fleeing prosecution or custody or confinement, or violating a condition or probation or parole, as specified in Section 11486.5.

(d) When a recipient described in subdivision (a) of Section 11265.45 reports income or a household composition change pursuant to subdivision (c), the county shall redetermine eligibility and grant
 amounts as follows:

(1) If the recipient reports an increase in income or household composition change for the first through 11th months of a year, the county shall verify the report and determine the recipient’s financial eligibility and grant amount.

(A) If the recipient is determined to be financially ineligible based on the increase in income or household composition change, the county shall discontinue the recipient with timely and adequate notice, effective at the end of the month in which the change occurred.

(B) If it is determined that the recipient’s grant amount should decrease based on the increase in income, or increase or decrease based on a change in household composition, the county shall increase or reduce the recipient’s grant amount for the remainder of the year with timely and adequate notice,
 effective the first of the month following the month in which the change occurred.

(C) If a recipient has reported a change in income or household composition in accordance with subdivision (c), an overpayment shall not be assessed for the following month if the county was unable to provide 10 days’ notice of the termination or reduction in benefits before the first of the month following the month in which the change occurred.

(2) If the recipient reports an increase in income for the 12th month of a grant year, the county shall verify this report and consider this income in redetermining eligibility and the grant amount for the following year.

(e) During the year, a recipient described in subdivision (a) of Section 11265.45 may report to the county, orally or in writing, any changes in income that may increase the
 recipient’s grant. Increases in the grant that result from reported changes in income shall be effective for the entire month in which the change is reported and any remaining months in the year. If the reported change in income results in an increase in benefits, the county shall issue the increased benefit amount within 10 days of receiving required verification.
